Illinois, session 104th, SB1808.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act is 5amended by changing Section 5.3 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3960/5.3)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)8    Sec. 5.3. Annual report of capital expenditures. 9    (a) In addition to the State Board's authority to require 10reports, the State Board shall require each health care 11facility to submit an annual report of all capital 12expenditures in excess of $200,000 (which shall be annually 13adjusted to reflect the increase in construction costs due to 14inflation) made by the health care facility during the most 15recent year. This annual report shall consist of a brief 16description of the capital expenditure, the amount and method 17of financing the capital expenditure, the certificate of need 18project number if the project was reviewed, and the total 19amount of capital expenditures financially committed for the 20year. Data collected from health care facilities pursuant to 21this Section shall not duplicate or overlap other data 22collected by the Department and must be collected as part of 23the State Board's Annual Questionnaires or supplements for   SB1808- 2 -LRB104 03305 SPS 13327 b1health care facilities that report these data.2    (b)(1) For the purposes of this subsection (b), "capital 3expenditures" means only expenditures required under 4subsection (a) for the erection, building, alteration, 5reconstruction, modernization, improvement, extension, or 6demolition of or by a hospital.7    (2) If a hospital under the University of Illinois 8Hospital Act or Hospital Licensing Act that has more than 100 9beds reports capital expenditures at or above the amount 10required under subsection (a), then the hospital shall also 11meet the reporting requirements under this subsection (b) for 12female-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, and small 13business enterprises with respect to those reported capital 14expenditures.15    (3) Each hospital shall include the following information 16in its annual report:17        (A) The hospital's capital expenditure spending goals 18    for female-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, and small 19    business enterprises. These goals shall be expressed as a 20    percentage of total capital expenditures reported by the 21    hospital submitting the report.22        (B) The hospital's actual capital expenditure spending 23    for female-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, and small 24    business enterprises. These actual expenditures shall be 25    expressed as a percentage of total capital expenditures 26    reported by the hospital submitting the report. The report   SB1808- 3 -LRB104 03305 SPS 13327 b1    may include actual spending on female-owned, 2    minority-owned, veteran-owned, and small business 3    enterprises that is less than the capital expenditure 4    threshold required to be reported under subsection (a) of 5    this Section.6        (C) The type or types of capital expenditure for which 7    the hospital shall be actively seeking supplier diversity 8    in the next year.9        (D) An outline of the plan developed to alert and 10    encourage female-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, 11    and small business enterprises providing the type or types 12    of services identified in subparagraph (C) to seek 13    business from the hospital.14        (E) An explanation of the challenges faced in finding 15    quality vendors and any suggestions for what the Health 16    Facilities and Services Review Board could do to be 17    helpful to identify those vendors.18        (F) A list of the certifications the hospital 19    recognizes.20        (G) The point of contact for any potential vendor who 21    wishes to do business with the hospital and an explanation 22    of the process for a vendor to enroll with the hospital as 23    a female-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, or small 24    business enterprise.25        (H) Any particular success stories to encourage other 26    hospitals to emulate best practices.  SB1808- 4 -LRB104 03305 SPS 13327 b1        (I) A section detailing the hospital's total 2    purchasing budget that encompasses all goods and services 3    purchased by the hospital in the preceding fiscal year. If 4    a hospital reports zero annual capital expenditures, this 5    section must still be included in the report. 6    (4) A health care system may develop a system-wide annual 7report that includes all hospitals in order to comply with the 8requirements of this subsection (b). Each annual report shall 9include as much State-specific data as possible. If the 10submitting entity does not submit State-specific data, then 11the hospital shall include any national data it does have and 12explain why it could not submit State-specific data and how it 13intends to do so in future reports, if possible.14    (5) Subject to appropriation, the Department of Central 15Management Services shall hold an annual workshop open to the 16public in 2017 and every year thereafter on the state of 17supplier diversity to collaboratively seek solutions to 18structural impediments to achieving stated goals, including 19testimony from subject matter experts.20    (6) The Health Facilities and Services Review Board shall 21publish a database on its website of the point of contact for 22each hospital for supplier diversity, along with a list of 23certifications each hospital recognizes from the information 24submitted in each annual report. The Health Facilities and 25Services Review Board shall publish each annual report on its 26website and shall maintain each annual report for at least 5   SB1808- 5 -LRB104 03305 SPS 13327 b1years.2    (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Health 3Facilities and Services Review Board shall not inquire about, 4review, obtain, or in any other way consider the information 5provided in this Section when reviewing an application for a 6permit or exemption or in taking any other action under this 7Act.8    (8) The annual report required under this subsection (b) 9shall be submitted by each hospital for its fiscal years that 10begin at least 6 months after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly. 12(Source: P.A. 99-767, eff. 8-12-16; 100-681, eff. 8-3-18.)